Utah statutes.
76-10-307.   Explosive, chemical, or incendiary device -- Delivery to common carrier or mailing.

Any person is guilty of a felony of the second degree who delivers or causes to be delivered to any express or railway company or other common carrier, or to any person, any explosive, chemical, or incendiary device, knowing it to be the device, without informing the common carrier or person of its nature or sends it through the mail.

